Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1506
Deferred compensation; availability and distribution of funds; Deferred Compensation Fund; created.

(1) Under the deferred compensation plan, any amount shall not be available to the participant or beneficiary prior to (a) the calendar year in which the participant attains age seventy and one-half years, (b) when the participant is separated from service with the state, or (c) when the participant has an unforeseeable emergency as determined by the Public Employees Retirement Board. The deferred compensation plan shall meet the minimum distribution requirements of section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code. Distribution shall be made as provided in subsection (2) of this section or sections 84-1509 and 84-1510.

(2) For amounts under the deferred compensation plan which are not provided for under an administrative services agreement pursuant to section 84-1509, payments and benefits shall be deposited in the Deferred Compensation Fund which is hereby created. The State Treasurer shall make payments to the employees from the Deferred Compensation Fund.

Laws 1973, LB 428, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1974, § 84-1329.03;

Laws 1979, LB 411, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 460, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 57.